test/src/morphology/verbTVaeå_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/gehålator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/gehålator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Normal even-syllable -a, -å and -e transitive verbs . Lexicon BASSAT_TV, LÁHPPET_TV, JUHKAT_TV, JIEHKET_TV, DIEHTET_TV, MÁHTTET_TV

Tests:
  Verb - bårråt: # BASSAT
    bårråt+V+TV+Inf: bårråt 
    bårråt+V+TV+Sup: båråtjit
    bårråt+V+TV+Ger: bårådijn
    bårråt+V+TV+PrfPrc: bårråm
    bårråt+V+TV+Actio+Ess: bårråmin
    bårråt+V+TV+Actio+Ela: bårråmis
    bårråt+V+TV+VAbess: båråk
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: båråv
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bårå
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: bårrå
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: bårrin 
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: bårråbihtte
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: bårråba
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: bårråp 
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: bårråbihtit
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bårri
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: bårriv
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: bårri
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: båråj
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: båråjma 
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: båråjda
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: båråjga
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: båråjma 
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: båråjda
    bårråt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: bårrin
    bårråt+V+TV+Imprt+Sg1: []
    bårråt+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: bårå
    bårråt+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: bårris
    bårråt+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: bårron 
    bårråt+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: bårre
    bårråt+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: bårriska
    bårråt+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1: bårrop
    bårråt+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: bårrit
    bårråt+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: bårrisa
    bårråt+V+TV+ImprtII+Sg1: []
    bårråt+V+TV+ImprtII+Sg2: bårru
    bårråt+V+TV+ImprtII+Sg3: bårrus
    bårråt+V+TV+ImprtII+Du1: bårrun 
    bårråt+V+TV+ImprtII+Du2: bårruda
    bårråt+V+TV+ImprtII+Du3: bårruska
    bårråt+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: bårrup
    bårråt+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: bårrut
    bårråt+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: bårrusa
    bårråt+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: båråtjav
    bårråt+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: båråtja
    bårråt+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: båråsj
    bårråt+V+TV+Pot+Du1: båråtjin 
    bårråt+V+TV+Pot+Du2: båråtjihppe
    bårråt+V+TV+Pot+Du3: båråtjibá
    bårråt+V+TV+Pot+Pl1: båråtjip
    bårråt+V+TV+Pot+Pl2: båråtjihpit
    bårråt+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: båråtji
    bårråt+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: båråduváv

  Verb - hållat: # BASSAT_TV
    hållat+V+TV+Inf: hållat 
    hållat+V+TV+Sup: hålatjit
    hållat+V+TV+Ger: håladijn
    hållat+V+TV+PrfPrc: hållam
    hållat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: hållamin
    hållat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: hållamis
    hållat+V+TV+VAbess: hålak
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hålav
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: håla
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hoallá
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: hållin 
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: hållabihtte
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: hållaba
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hållap 
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hållabihtit
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hålli
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hålliv
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: hålli
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hålaj
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: hålajma
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: hålajda
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: hålajga
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: hålajma 
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hålajda
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hållin
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: håla
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: hållis
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: hållon 
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: hoalle
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: hålliska
    hållat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: hållup
    hållat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: hållut
    hållat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: hållusa
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: hålatjav
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: hålatja
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: hålasj
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: hålatji
    hållat+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: håladuváv

  Verb - nerrat: # BASSAT_TV
    nerrat+V+TV+Inf: nerrat 
    nerrat+V+TV+Sup: neratjit
    nerrat+V+TV+Ger: neradijn
    nerrat+V+TV+PrfPrc: nerram
    nerrat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: nerramin
    nerrat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: nerramis
    nerrat+V+TV+VAbess: nerak
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nerav
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nera
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nærrá
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: nerrin 
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: nerrabihtte
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: nerraba
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nerrap 
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nerrabihtit
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nerri
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nerriv
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: nerri
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: neraj
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: nerajma
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: nerajda
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: nerajga
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: nerajma 
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: nerajda
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nerrin
    nerrat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: nera
    nerrat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: nerris
    nerrat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: nerron 
    nerrat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: nærre
    nerrat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: nerriska
    nerrat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: nerrup
    nerrat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: nerrut
    nerrat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: nerrusa
    nerrat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: neratjav
    nerrat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: neratja
    nerrat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: nerasj
    nerrat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: neratji
    nerrat+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: neraduváv

  Verb - gæhttjat: # BASSAT_TV
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Inf: gæhttjat 
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Sup: gehtjatjit
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ger: gehtjadijn
    gæhttjat+V+TV+PrfPrc: gæhttjam
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: gæhttjamin
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: gæhttjamis
    gæhttjat+V+TV+VAbess: gehtjak
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gehtjav
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gehtja
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gæhttjá
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: gæhttjin 
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: gæhttjabihtte
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: gæhttjaba
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: gæhttjap 
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: gæhttjabihtit
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gæhttji
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: gæhttjiv
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: gæhttji
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: gehtjaj
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: gehtjajma 
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: gehtjajda
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: gehtjajga
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: gehtjajma 
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: gehtjajda
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: gæhttjin
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: gehtja
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: gæhttjis
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: gæhttjon 
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: gæhttje
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: gæhttjiska
    gæhttjat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: gæhttjup
    gæhttjat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: gæhttjut
    gæhttjat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: gæhttjusa
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: gehtjatjav
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: gehtjatja
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: gehtjasj
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: gehtjatji
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gehtjaduváv

  Verb - rahpat: # BASSAT_TV
    rahpat+V+TV+Inf: rahpat 
    rahpat+V+TV+Sup: rabátjit
    rahpat+V+TV+Ger: rabádijn
    rahpat+V+TV+PrfPrc: rahpam
    rahpat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: rahpamin
    rahpat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: rahpamis
    rahpat+V+TV+VAbess: rabák
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rabáv
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rabá
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: rahpabihtit
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rahpi
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rahpiv
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: rahpi
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rabáj
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: rabájma 
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: rabájda
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: rabájga
    rahpat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: rabá
    rahpat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: rahpis
    rahpat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: rahpon 
    rahpat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: rahppe
    rahpat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: rahpiska
    rahpat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: rahpup
    rahpat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: rahput
    rahpat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: rahpusa
    rahpat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: rabátjav
    rahpat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: rabátja
    rahpat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: rabásj
    rahpat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: rabátji
    rahpat+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rabáduváv

  Verb - roaddat: # BASSAT_TV
    roaddat+V+TV+Inf: roaddat 
    roaddat+V+TV+Sup: råttatjit
    roaddat+V+TV+Ger: råttadijn
    roaddat+V+TV+PrfPrc: roaddam
    roaddat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: roaddamin
    roaddat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: roaddamis
    roaddat+V+TV+VAbess: råttak
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: råttav
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: råtta
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: roaddabihtit
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: roaddi
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: roaddiv
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: roaddi
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: råttaj
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: råttajma 
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: råttajda
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: råttajga
    roaddat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: råtta
    roaddat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: roaddis
    roaddat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: roaddon 
    roaddat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: roadde
    roaddat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: roaddiska
    roaddat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: roaddup
    roaddat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: roaddut
    roaddat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: roaddusa
    roaddat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: råttatjav
    roaddat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: råttatja
    roaddat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: råttasj
    roaddat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: råttatji
    roaddat+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: råttaduváv

  Verb - njammat: # JUHKAT_TV
    njammat+V+TV+Inf: njammat 
    njammat+V+TV+Sup: njamátjit
    njammat+V+TV+Ger: njamádijn
    njammat+V+TV+PrfPrc: njammam
    njammat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: njammamin
    njammat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: njammamis
    njammat+V+TV+VAbess: njamák
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njamáv
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: njamá
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: njammabihtit
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: njammi
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: njammiv
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: njammi
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: njamáj
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: njamájma 
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: njamájda
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: njamájga
    njammat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: njamá
    njammat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: njammis
    njammat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: njammon 
    njammat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: njamme
    njammat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: njammiska
    njammat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: njammup
    njammat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: njammut
    njammat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: njammusa
    njammat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: njamátjav
    njammat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: njamátja
    njammat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: njamásj
    njammat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: njamátji
    njammat+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njamáduváv

  Verb - oajttet: # LÁHPPET_TV
    oajttet+V+TV+Inf: oajttet 
    oajttet+V+TV+Sup: oajtátjit
    oajttet+V+TV+Ger: oajtedijn
    oajttet+V+TV+PrfPrc: oajttám
    oajttet+V+TV+Actio+Ess: oajttemin
    oajttet+V+TV+Actio+Ela: oajttemis
    oajttet+V+TV+VAbess: oajtek
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oajtáv
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: oajtá
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: oajttebihtit
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: oajtti
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: oajttiv
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: oajtti
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: åjtij
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: åjtijma 
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: åjtijda
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: åjtijga
    oajttet+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: oajte
    oajttet+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: oajttis
    oajttet+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: oajtton 
    oajttet+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: oajtte
    oajttet+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: oajttiska
    oajttet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: oajttup
    oajttet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: oajttut
    oajttet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: oajttusa
    oajttet+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: åjtitjav
    oajttet+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: åjtitja
    oajttet+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: åjtisj
    oajttet+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: åjtitji
    oajttet+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oajteduváv
